Utah statutes.
23-23-5.   Certificate of registration -- Renewal.
(1)  A landowner association may not establish or operate a cooperative
wildlife management unit without first obtaining a certificate of registration
from the Wildlife Board.
(2)  The Wildlife Board may renew annually certificates of registration if the
landowner association has previously complied with this chapter and the rules
of the Wildlife Board.
